California statutes. Water Code
Nothing in this section shall be construed as conflicting with the powers of the State Reclamation Board or the California Debris Commission or contractors or permittees carrying out flood control projects under authority of either board or commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

7048.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the protection, restoration, and enhancement of urban creek channels provide potential benefits to the state by combining an effective and efficient means of flood damage reduction with the preservation and enhancement of natural environmental values. The Legislature further finds that urban creek protection, restoration, and enhancement are best undertaken by local agencies and organizations with assistance from the state. It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to restore the ecological viability of creek environments located in predominantly urban areas, thereby enhancing aesthetic, recreational, and fish and wildlife values.

(b) (1) The director may establish a program of flood damage reduction and urban creek restoration known as the Urban Streams Restoration Program. The program shall consist of both of the following components:

(A) The development of the capability by the department to respond to requests from local agencies and organizations for planning and design assistance for efficient and effective urban creek protection, restoration, and enhancement.

(B) To the extent that funds are provided, a process for awarding competitive grants.

(2) For purposes of this section, urban creek protection, restoration, and enhancement include, but are not limited to,
 the maintenance of channel capacity, channel stabilization, vegetation management, the reduction of water quality impairments and nonpoint source water pollution, the establishment of parkways for public use that benefit flood control and water quality, and adaptive management to meet program objectives. Where appropriate, the protection, restoration, and enhancement shall utilize efficient, nonstructural low-maintenance flood protection techniques. The department shall utilize in this program its expertise in a variety of disciplines, including, but not limited to, soil bioengineering, hydrology, and plant ecology.

(3) (A) The department shall maintain a balance in allocating the money annually available for grants to small urban creek restoration projects and large urban stream restoration projects, allocating
 not less than 35 percent to both small and large projects. For purposes of this section, “small urban creek restoration projects” are projects for which total costs, including acquisition and restoration costs, are below one million dollars ($1,000,000) and “large urban stream restoration projects” are projects for which total costs, including acquisition and restoration costs, are one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), if an insufficient number of qualified projects are available to fully meet the allocation requirement, the department may grant funds to any project that is otherwise qualified, in order to ensure that all available funds are used efficiently.

(c) In responding to requests for assistance, the department shall give
 priority to those projects that are being planned in conjunction with, or in lieu of, local flood control projects. The department may award grants and contracts to local agencies and organizations as provided for in the budget of the department. Participating local agencies and organizations shall follow procedures, plans, and practices that are acceptable to the department, and shall conform to guidelines established by the department that define the level of contribution and participation required by local agencies and organizations.

The department shall coordinate the program with the Department of Fish and Wildlife during the formulation of guidelines and project planning for urban creek protection, restoration, and enhancement. The department shall also consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife on project criteria which may include economic,
 environmental, and social benefits to be achieved.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the duties and responsibilities of the department be identified as the Urban Streams Restoration Program and be carried out by an office or staff designated for this purpose. Information on how to obtain planning, design, and financial assistance should be readily accessible to the public.

(e) As used in this section, “urban creek” means a creek, stream, or river that crosses built-up residential, commercial, or industrial property, or that crosses land where, in the near future, the land use will be residential, commercial, or industrial.

(f) For the purposes of this section, eligible activities include, but are not
 limited to, the maintenance of channel capacity and stabilization of the morphological equilibrium of a natural channel for purposes of flood damage reduction, erosion control, and bank stabilization which may include nonstructural as well as structural projects.

(g) The department may adopt regulations that define “adaptive management” for the purposes of the Urban Streams Restoration Program, and establish criteria to fund projects that include adaptive management activities.

(h) The department may amend or utilize existing regulations for approving competitive grants. The regulations may include, but are not limited to, an application process, grant approval criteria, and grantee’s reporting requirements. The department shall annually make available to the public, in a form
 that is readily accessible, information regarding the status of funds appropriated for these purposes and projects that received grants.

(i) In order to address the unique ecological, flood control, water quality, and hydrological conditions associated with urban creeks and watersheds on the California-Mexico border, the department shall consult with the California-Mexico Border Relations Council to establish criteria to fund projects that improve conditions for cross-border urban creeks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 668, Sec. 9.   (AB 965)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7049.

(a) Upon an appropriation of funds from the Legislature, the department shall establish a program to implement watershed-based riverine and riparian stewardship improvements by providing technical and financial assistance in support of projects that reduce flood risk, restore and enhance fish populations and habitat, improve water quality, achieve climate change benefits, and in general ensure resilient ecological function within areas that include, but are not limited to, urban or urbanizing areas of the state.

(b) The program shall support the purposes of and be coordinated with the Urban Streams Restoration Program established pursuant to Section 7048, fish passage improvements, and other similar programs to accomplish increased ecological, stream management,
 climate, and community improvement benefits from state and other funds available for riverine stewardship projects. The department may participate in and support local partnerships, including, but not limited to, in disadvantaged communities, to ensure projects incorporate the best-available science, assessment data, and ecologically relevant practices, and address state and local community needs and priorities.

(c) The program shall include all of the following elements:

(1) Support for partnerships with local agencies, nonprofit organizations, resource conservation districts, and community groups to identify multibenefit opportunities, local needs, and watershed restoration or enhancement objectives. Partnerships shall include local community nonprofit organizations and other state agencies as appropriate and to the degree those agencies and organizations are able to
 participate.

(2) Early engagement by the department. Engagement in conceptualizing and defining the project shall be prioritized over the design, construction, and operation of a completed project.

(3) Assistance in planning the natural resource restoration, landscaping, and infrastructure elements of a project consistent with appropriate local and regional land use and resource recovery plans.

(4) Design assistance to ensure a project will protect or enhance natural river and stream process and function using the best bioengineering and ecological practices while considering low-impact development, energy and water conservation, and community access and use for local recreation, trails, and other purposes.

(5) Evaluation and assessment processes to
 monitor success in meeting riverine stewardship goals and community needs.

(6) Assistance, as appropriate, with project administration, including, but not limited to, communication among partnership groups, enhancing the capacity of communities to effectively participate, and looking for and managing various funds obtained for the project.

(7) Plans or schedules delineating the work to be completed by the department and each partner.

(d) The department may provide technical assistance for the purposes of this section either directly or otherwise, including, but not limited to, by collaborating with other state agencies, appropriate California State University or University of California programs, or other similar programs, providing educational development and field experience for students in watershed sciences.

(e) Grant funds available for the purposes of Section 7048 or this section may be available for use by the recipient for design, engineering, and other technical assistance for the purposes of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 216.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Cuts in Banks of Streams [7050. - 7051.]

7050.

Every person owning or occupying lands upon the bank of any stream where the lands lying back of the stream are lower than the bank, is responsible for all damages sustained by the owners or occupants of lower lands by reason of any cut or embrasure made in the bank of the stream by the owner or occupant of the bank.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.

If the cuts were made for the purpose of irrigation, and headgates and culverts were installed which competent persons consider sufficient to restrain the water, and if great diligence was used to prevent damage, these facts may be pleaded and proved in mitigation of damages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Use of Streams as Conduits [7075. - 7075.]

7075.

Water which has been appropriated may be turned into the channel of another stream, mingled with its water, and then reclaimed; but in reclaiming it the water already appropriated by another shall not be diminished.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. County of Ventura Fire Suppression [7080. - 7080.]

7080.

(a) (1) Beginning July 1, 2030, a water supplier shall have access to sufficient backup energy sources to operate critical fire suppression infrastructure needed to supply water for at least 24 hours for the purpose of fire suppression in high or very high fire hazard severity zones in the County of Ventura or have access to alternative sources of water supplied by a different water supplier or agency that can serve this same purpose of supplying backup water to critical wells and water pumps for 24 hours. If backup energy sources are not equipped with an automatic or remote transfer switch, backup power shall be turned on as soon as practically possible after deenergization. For backup energy sources equipped
 with an automatic or remote transfer switch, backup power shall be turned on within 30 minutes of a loss in power. For water suppliers with alternative sources of water supplied by others, the source of water shall be available within 30 minutes and supply the amount of water otherwise supplied by the water supplier.

(2) In the event that the backup energy source used by the water supplier to meet the requirements in paragraph (1) is not a permanent and stationary source of energy, a water supplier may use mobile backup energy sources or procure an energy source via an established mutual aid agreement provided the backup energy source can provide power within 12 hours of the National Weather Service alerting the region of a red flag warning and provide power for at least 24 hours after a loss of power and within
 60 minutes of a loss of power.

(3) A water supplier that has entered into a contract to procure backup energy sources in compliance with paragraph (1) before July 1, 2030, but has not received the backup energy source by July 1, 2030, shall be considered to be in compliance with this subdivision if the water supplier has access to, or possession of, the backup energy source by January 1, 2033.

(b) (1) The water supplier shall identify critical fire suppression infrastructure or alternative sources of water and provide that identification to the Ventura County Office of Emergency Services no later than May 1, 2026. If any changes are made to the list by the water supplier, the water supplier shall provide an updated list
 to the Ventura County Office of Emergency Services within 120 days of the changes being made.

(2) The Ventura County Office of Emergency Services shall establish procedures for a water supplier to provide the identification required in paragraph (1) by March 1, 2026, including procedures for updating or amending the information at the request of the office.

(c) (1) By January 1, 2027, the Ventura County Fire Department shall develop minimum fire safety standards, in consultation with water suppliers and local fire departments, for the purpose of fire hardening critical fire suppression infrastructure and backup energy sources located in the high or very high fire hazard severity zone, as identified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(2) Upon completion of the minimum fire safety standards required by paragraph (1), the Ventura County Fire Department shall annually inspect critical fire suppression infrastructure and backup energy sources located in the high or very high fire hazard severity zone to ensure critical fire suppression infrastructure and backup energy sources located in high or very high fire hazard severity zones meet fire safety standards developed by the Ventura County Fire Department. If there is a local fire department in the area being inspected, the inspection by the Ventura County Fire Department shall occur in consultation with the local fire department.

(3) Upon completion of the minimum fire safety standards required by paragraph (1), the water supplier shall annually inspect critical
 fire suppression infrastructure and backup energy sources serving the high or very high fire hazard severity zone, but not located within the zone, to ensure functionality.

(d) (1) (A) A water supplier shall establish an emergency preparedness plan for response to red flag warnings, extreme weather events, and other major power outages or emergencies that pose a potential threat to providing water service in coordination with the Ventura County Office of Emergency Services and the Ventura County Fire Department. The water supplier shall annually review the emergency preparedness plan and update if necessary.

(B) The emergency preparedness plan shall include, but is not limited to, the consideration of filling water tanks and stationing emergency
 backup energy sources.

(C) For water systems that are required to prepare and submit an emergency response plan to the Public Utilities Commission, the emergency preparedness plan shall be incorporated into the emergency response plan.

(2) If the National Weather Service alerts the region of a red flag warning, a water supplier shall initiate action under the emergency preparedness plan established pursuant to paragraph (1).

(e) (1) A water supplier shall notify the Ventura County Office of Emergency Services within three business days of any reduction in its water delivery capacity that could substantially hinder firefighting operations or significantly delay the replenishment of reservoirs.

(2) A water supplier shall alert the Ventura County Office of Emergency Services as soon as it becomes aware during a fire event of any reduction in its water delivery capacity that could substantially hinder firefighting operations or significantly delay the replenishment of reservoirs.

(f) (1) If any fire damages and makes uninhabitable more than 10 residential dwellings within the service area of a water supplier, there shall be a report made by the Ventura County Fire Department in cooperation with the water supplier. The report shall be presented to the Ventura County Board of Supervisors by the Ventura County Fire Department at a regularly scheduled board meeting.

(2) The report described
 in paragraph (1) shall include, and
 is limited to, an assessment of whether water tanks were filled at an appropriate level for fire suppression, as outlined in the emergency preparedness plan prepared pursuant to subdivision (d), whether disruption of water delivery due to a lack of electricity was timely and appropriately mitigated by the water supplier, and whether critical fire suppression infrastructure and backup energy sources met the fire safety standards described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Critical fire suppression infrastructure” means wells and water pumps that are critical for supplying water for fire suppression in the high or very high fire hazard severity zone.

(2) “High or very high fire hazard severity zone” shall refer to those areas identified by the State Fire Marshal as high or very high fire hazard severity zones pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code.

(3) (A) “Water supplier” means a community water system, as that term is defined in subdivision (i) of Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code, that supplies water that is used for the suppression of fire in either a high or very high fire hazard severity zone to more than 20 total residential dwellings in those zones in the County of Ventura.

(B) “Water supplier” does not include a water wholesaler that does not provide retail water service.

(h) This section shall not apply to the following:

(1) Water delivery systems that are gravity fed and do not require any backup power to continue to operate during a power shutoff.

(2) Nonpotable, recycled, irrigation, or agricultural water systems that are not used for fire suppression.

(i) Nothing in this section changes the confidentiality level of the information shared with the Ventura County Office of Emergency Services pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 690, Sec. 1.   (AB 367)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. FLOOD CONTROL [8000. - 9651.]



PART 1. LOCAL FLOOD CONTROL [8000. - 8201.]



  CHAPTER 1. Flood Control by Cities [8000. - 8061.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [8000. - 8007.]

8000.

The provisions of this chapter are intended to be paramount and controlling as to all matters provided for in, and as to all questions arising out of procedure under, this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8001.

As used in this chapter, “works” includes canals, ditches, levees, dikes, embankments, dams, machinery, and other appropriate or ancillary means of accomplishing the purposes mentioned in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8002.

As used in this chapter, “city” means any city, town, or municipal corporation incorporated under the laws of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8003.

As used in this chapter, “city council” includes the legislative body of any city by whatever name it may be designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8004.

Every publication required by this chapter shall be made in some newspaper published in the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8005.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, if publication is in a daily paper the publication shall appear in at least 10 issues thereof, and if in a weekly paper in at least two issues thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8006.

No publication shall be deemed to have begun until any required preceding publication has been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8007.

A capital improvement project undertaken by a charter city to extend that city’s water, sewer, or storm drain system or similar system to a disadvantaged community in an unincorporated area shall be considered a public work for the purpose of Section 1720 of the Labor Code, but any subsequent project to construct, expand, reconstruct, install, or repair such systems that have been so extended and that are conducted within that city’s political boundaries shall not be considered a public work for the purpose of Section 1720 of the Labor Code as a result of the extension. For the purpose of this section, “disadvantaged community” means a disadvantaged community as defined in Section 79505.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 20.   Effective May 21, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Preliminary Proceedings [8010. - 8016.]

8010.

Any city may, pursuant to this chapter, incur indebtedness and liability, although in excess of the income and revenue provided by it for the current fiscal year, but not so that the aggregate funded indebtedness of the city exceeds 6 per cent of the assessed value of all the real and personal property in the city, for any or all, or any part of, the following purposes:

(a) To protect the city from overflow by water.

(b) To drain the city.

(c) To secure an outlet for overflow water and drainage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8011.

The works may be situated within or without the territorial limits of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8012.

The city council shall have some competent person make general plans and estimates of the cost of the contemplated works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8013.

The general plans and estimates shall, after adoption, be filed in the office of the clerk of the city, and shall be substantially adhered to thereafter in proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8014.

After the filing of the general plans and estimates, and by resolution or ordinance of intention passed at a regular meeting by a vote of two-thirds of all its members and approved by the executive of the city, the city council shall determine, if so advised, that the public good demands the construction, acquisition, and completion, or either, of the works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8015.

The city council, by the same resolution or ordinance, shall determine, if so advised, that the cost of the works will be too great to be paid out of the ordinary income or revenue of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8016.

The resolution or ordinance of intention, shall, after its passage and approval, be published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Election [8020. - 8026.]

8020.

Within one month after the publication of the resolution or ordinance of intention, and by resolution or ordinance passed at a regular meeting by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, and approved by the executive of the city, the city council shall call a special election, and submit to the qualified voters of the city the proposition to incur a debt for any or all of the purposes mentioned in this chapter which have been determined to be demanded for the public good.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8021.

The resolution or ordinance calling the special election shall specify the following:

(a) The purpose for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred.

(b) The estimated cost of the things proposed.

(c) That bonds of the city will issue in the amount of the estimated cost.

(d) The number and character of the bonds.

(e) The rate of interest to be paid.

(f) The amount of the tax levy for each year during the outstanding of the bonds to be made for their payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8022.

The resolution or ordinance calling the election shall be published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8023.

The city council shall publish, after the publication of the resolution or ordinance calling the election and prior to the day of holding the special election, a notice of the election, which shall set forth substantially all the matters contained in the resolution or ordinance calling the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.

The special election shall be held in the manner provided by law for holding elections in the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8025.

The votes of two-thirds of all the voters voting at the special election are necessary to authorize the incurring of any indebtedness or the issuance of any bonds under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8026.

If two-thirds of all the votes cast at the special election are in favor of the proposition submitted, the city council may, by ordinance reciting the result of the election, provide for the issuance of the proposed bonds and any matter incidental thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bonds [8030. - 8039.]

8030.

All bonds issued under this chapter shall be serial bonds and of such denominations as the city council determines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8031.

No bond shall be for less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor for more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8032.

Not less than one-fortieth part of the whole indebtedness evidenced by the whole of the issue of bonds shall be, by the terms of the bonds, made payable each and every year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8033.

Each bond shall be made payable in lawful money of the United States on a day and at a place designated in the bond, with interest at the rate specified in the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8034.

The interest rate shall not exceed 8 percent per annum, and shall be fixed by the city council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

8035.

The place of payment shall be either at the office of the treasurer of the city, or at some designated bank in San Francisco, Chicago, or New York.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8036.

The bonds shall be executed on the part of the city by the mayor or other executive, and the treasurer, and countersigned by the clerk of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8037.

The interest coupons shall be numbered consecutively and signed by the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8038.

Any of the bonds may be issued and sold by the city council at not less than its face value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8039.

The proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be deposited in the city treasury to the credit of a designated fund and shall be applied exclusively to the purposes and objects for which the electors have voted to incur indebtedness or liability until the purposes and objects are accomplished, after which the surplus, if any, may be transferred to the general fund of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Powers of City Council [8050. - 8054.]

8050.

The city council of every city in or for which any works are constructed for the purposes specified in this chapter, and for which indebtedness has been incurred under the provisions of this chapter may do any of the following:

(a) Make all needed rules and regulations for acquisition, construction, and completion of the works.

(b) Appoint all necessary agents, superintendents, and engineers to supervise and construct the works.

(c) Protect and preserve the rights and interests of the city in respect to the works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8051.

All contracts for the works shall be let, in such parcels as the city council determines, to the lowest responsible bidder, after notice inviting sealed proposals has been published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8052.

Security or bonds may be required in order to guarantee good faith in bidding and in the performance of contracts, or either, in such amount as the city council determines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8053.

The city council may reject any or all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8054.

The city council may, by resolution, require the treasurer of the city to give additional bonds for the safe custody and care of public funds derived under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Taxation [8060. - 8061.]

8060.

The city council, at the time of fixing the general tax levy, and in the manner provided for the general tax levy, shall levy and collect each year for the term of 40 years, a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on the bonds and also one-fortieth part of the aggregate amount of the indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8061.

The taxes required by this chapter to be levied and collected shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for municipal purposes, and shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as other municipal taxes are collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Flood Control in Counties [8100. - 8129.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Powers Relating to Flood Control [8100. - 8100.]

8100.

Under such limitations and restrictions as are prescribed by law, and in addition to jurisdiction and powers otherwise conferred, the boards of supervisors, in their respective counties, may appropriate and expend money from the general fund of the county for any of the following purposes in connection with streams or rivers in the county:

(a) The construction of works, improvements, levees or check dams to prevent overflow and flooding.

(b) The protection and reforestation of watersheds.

(c) The conservation of the flood waters.

(d) The making of all surveys, maps and plats necessary to carry out any work, construction or improvement authorized by this article.

(e) The carrying out of any work, construction or improvement authorized by this article outside the county if the rivers or streams affected flow in or through more than one county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Flood Control Work Outside of County [8101. - 8106.]

8101.

A board of supervisors may appropriate and expend money from the general or other appropriate funds of the county for the construction of works, improvements, levees or check dams to prevent the overflow and flooding of streams and rivers in the county, and for that purpose may construct works, improvements, levees or check dams outside the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8102.

Work under this article may be done upon channels, streams or rivers which flow through or lie in more than one county, or where the work is reasonably necessary for the control of flood waters in the county upon a channel, river or stream which does not lie or flow in or through two or more counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8103.

In connection with flood control work under this article, whether done by the county or by any district therein or agency thereof, highways, bridges and other public works affected thereby or which will be of public benefit, whether located in the county, or wholly or partially in incorporated or unincorporated territory outside the county may be constructed, reconstructed, remodeled, maintained, repaired or demolished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8104.

The work described in the next preceding section may be done at the expense of the county doing the flood control work, or of any district or agency therein which is doing the work. The legislative bodies of the counties and cities affected may provide by agreement that the work be done at the joint expense of the county or counties and city or cities in which the work is done.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8105.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the imposition of any tax or special assessment either by the county or any district in, or agency of, the county on any property outside the county doing the work whether the work is done directly by the county or by any district in, or agency of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8106.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the doing of any work outside the county without the consent of the legislative body of the county in which the work is to be done if in unincorporated territory or of the legislative body of any city in which any of the works are situated in whole or in part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. County Flood Control Districts [8110. - 8110.]

8110.

The board of supervisors may provide by ordinance for the organization and government of districts for the following purposes:

(a) To protect and preserve the banks of rivers and streams and lands lying contiguous thereto from injury by overflow or washing.

(b) To provide for the improvement of rivers and streams.

(c) To prevent the obstruction of rivers and streams.

(d) To assess, levy and collect within each district a tax for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Improvement of Non-Navigable Streams [8125. - 8129.]

8125.

“Non-navigable streams,” as used in this article, means streams and washes in a county which are not declared by law to be navigable and which are not in fact navigable for commercial purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8126.

The board of supervisors may provide for widening, deepening, straightening, removing obstructions from, and otherwise improving non-navigable streams the overflow of which interferes with highways, and for protecting the banks and adjacent lands from overflow of non-navigable streams.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8127.

The board may make regulations for the use of the streams and the repair and control of the works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8128.

No regulations of the board nor improvements directed by it to be made shall in any manner interfere with the private rights or privileges of riparian owners, miners, or others.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8129.

Whenever, in the opinion of the board of supervisors, the general fund is insufficient to defray the cost of the improvements provided for under this article, the board may levy a tax or contract a bonded indebtedness therefor in the manner provided by Title 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 320.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Transfer of Storm Drain Improvements, Drainage Improvements, and Drainage Systems to Flood Control Districts [8150. - 8165.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [8150. - 8152.]

8150.

As used in this chapter, “drainage improvement” means any storm drain improvement, drainage improvement, or drainage system, authorized to be transferred pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

8151.

As used in this chapter, “date of transfer” means (a) the date of the resolution of the governing body of a flood control district accepting any drainage improvement transferred to it by a county as provided in Article 2 of this chapter, and (b) the date of the resolution, order, or ordinance of the legislative body of any city transferring and conveying any drainage improvement to the flood control district pursuant to Article 3 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

8152.

As used in this chapter “city” includes city and county, and “county” does not include city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transfers by Counties [8155. - 8158.]

8155.

Drainage improvements authorized to be transferred and conveyed by this article are those which lie within the territorial limits of the flood control district to which they are conveyed, and are included in one or all of the following classes:

(a) Those which were constructed under the jurisdiction, control, or supervision of the board of supervisors of the county, and which are under the jurisdiction of the board.

(b) Those which were constructed by or for the county or any drainage district or flood control district in such county.
